Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.34.070

Proposed preliminary budget.

On or before the first business day in the third month prior to the beginning of the biennium of a city or at such other time as the city may provide by ordinance or charter, the clerk or other person designated by the charter, by ordinances, or by the chief administrative officer of the city shall submit to the chief administrative officer a proposed preliminary budget which shall set forth the complete financial program of the city for the ensuing fiscal biennium, showing the expenditure program requested by each department and the sources of revenue by which each such program is proposed to be financed.

The revenue section shall set forth in comparative and tabular form for each fund the actual receipts for the last completed fiscal biennium, the estimated receipts for the current fiscal biennium, and the estimated receipts for the ensuing fiscal biennium, which shall include the amount to be raised from ad valorem taxes and unencumbered fund balances estimated to be available at the close of the current fiscal biennium. However, if the city was not utilizing a fiscal biennium budget for the previous three years, it shall set forth its fiscal years' revenues to reflect actual and estimated receipts as if it had previously utilized a biennial budgetary process.

The expenditure section shall set forth in comparative and tabular form for each fund and every department operating within each fund the actual expenditures for the last completed fiscal biennium, the appropriations for the current fiscal biennium, and the estimated expenditures for the ensuing fiscal biennium. However, if the city was not utilizing a fiscal biennium budget for the previous three years, it shall set forth its fiscal years' expenditures to reflect actual and estimated levels as if it had previously utilized a biennial budgetary process. The expenditure section shall further set forth separately the salary or salary range for each office, position, or job classification together with the title or position designation thereof. However, salaries may be set out in total amounts under each department if a detailed schedule of such salaries and positions be attached and made a part of the budget document.

[ 1985 c 175 s 39.]